Utah statutes.
63F-1-207.   Coordination within the executive branch -- Cooperation with other branches.

(1)  In accordance with the executive branch strategic plan and the requirements of this title, the chief information officer shall coordinate the development of information technology systems between two or more executive branch agencies subject to:

(a)  the budget approved by the Legislature; and

(b) Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.

(2)  In addition to the coordination described in Subsection (1), the chief information officer shall promote cooperation regarding information technology in a manner consistent with the interbranch coordination plan created in accordance with Section 63F-1-201.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

